Indiana, session 2026, HB1173.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-20.5-21.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 21.5. Designated Public Forums
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 4-20.5-1-3(a). The term includes a state educational
institution.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "designated public forum"
means state owned real property that has been intentionally
opened for expressive activity only for use by certain groups or for
the discussion of certain subjects. The term includes civic centers
and facilities available for lease by the public for events.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b), an agency may impose time,
place, and manner restrictions on speech in a designated public
forum, provided that such restrictions are:
(1) justified by a compelling interest of the agency;
(2) narrowly tailored to achieve the interest described in
2026 IN 1173—LS 6502/DI 116


subdivision (1);
(3) administered using the least restrictive means available;
and
(4) viewpoint neutral.
(b) An agency may limit access under subsection (a) to certain
subject matters or classes of speakers to align with the designated
public forum's intended purpose; however, an agency may not
exclude speech:
(1) made by a religious or political group, including speech
made for fundraising purposes, if the speech is consistent with
the designated public forum's purpose; or
(2) solely because it expresses a religious or political
viewpoint.
The exclusion of speech described in subdivision (1) or (2)
constitutes viewpoint discrimination and is prohibited under this
section.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-5-20, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) The governing body of any school
corporation may:
(1) permit any of its facilities to be used by any person in
situations and at times that do not interfere with use of the facility
for school purposes, including:
(A) use of a swimming pool or other athletic facility; or
(B) use of classrooms or other space in a school for purposes
of school age childcare; child care; and
(2) incur any necessary expense in the use or operation of the
facility.
The governing body may set up and charge a schedule of fees for
admission to or use of any facility outside the school corporation's
regular school program. Fees shall be deposited in the operations fund
or the extracurricular account of the school corporation.
(b) IC 36-1-4-23 applies to a facility described in subsection (a).
SECTION 3. IC 36-1-4-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) As used in this section, "designated public
forum" is property owned by a political subdivision that has been
intentionally opened for expressive activity only for use by certain
groups or for the discussion of certain subjects. The term includes
civic centers and facilities available for lease by the public for
events.
2026 IN 1173—LS 6502/DI 116


(b) Subject to subsection (c), a political subdivision may impose
time, place, and manner restrictions on speech in a designated
public forum, provided that such restrictions are:
(1) justified by a compelling interest of the political
subdivision;
(2) narrowly tailored to achieve the interest described in
subdivision (1);
(3) administered using the least restrictive means available;
and
(4) viewpoint neutral.
(c) A political subdivision may limit access under subsection (b)
to certain subject matters or classes of speakers to align with the
designated public forum's intended purpose; however, a political
subdivision may not exclude speech:
(1) made by a religious or political group, including speech
made for fundraising purposes, if the speech is consistent with
the designated public forum's purpose; or
(2) solely because it expresses a religious or political
viewpoint.
The exclusion of speech described in subdivision (1) or (2)
constitutes viewpoint discrimination and is prohibited under this
section.
2026 IN 1173—LS 6502/DI 116